Utah statutes.
53A-1a-107.   State Board of Education assistance to districts and schools.
In order to assist school districts and individual schools in acquiring and
maintaining the characteristics set forth in Section 53A-1a-104, the State
Board of Education shall:
(1)  provide the framework for an education system, including core
competencies and their assessment, in which school districts and public
schools permit students to advance by demonstrating competency in subject
matter and mastery of skills;
(2)  develop and disseminate a state model curriculum, structured to
incorporate the concepts of quality versus quantity, depth versus breadth,
subject integration and application, applied thinking skills, character
development, and a global prospective, which districts and schools may use to
assist teachers in helping students acquire the competencies and skills
required to advance through the public education system, and periodically
review and, if appropriate, revise the curriculum;
(3)  conduct a statewide public awareness program on competency-based
educational systems;
(4)  compile and publish, for the state as a whole, a set of educational
performance indicators describing trends in student performance;
(5)  promote a public education climate of high expectations and academic
excellence;
(6)  disseminate successful site-based decision-making models to districts and
schools and provide teacher professional development opportunities and
evaluation programs for site-based plans consistent with Subsections 53A-
1a-104(7) and 53A-6-102(2)(a) and (b);
(7)  provide a mechanism for widespread dissemination of information about
strategic planning for public education, including involvement of business and
industry in the education process, in order to ensure the understanding and
support of all the individuals and groups concerned with the mission of public
education as outlined in Section 53A-1a-103;
(8)  provide for a research and development clearing house at the state level
to receive and share with school districts and public schools information on
effective and innovative practices and programs in education;
(9)  help school districts develop and implement guidelines, strategies, and
professional development programs for administrators and teachers consistent
with Subsections 53A-1a-104(7) and 53A-6-102(2)(a) and (b) focused on
improving interaction with parents and promoting greater parental involvement
in the public schools; and
(10)  in concert with the State Board of Regents and the state's colleges of
education review and revise teacher licensing requirements to be consistent
with teacher preparation for participation in personalized education programs
within the public schools.
